apertium-da-nb.da.dix
<pardef n="mal/e__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ede</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="dan/ne__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ner</l>       <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nes</l>       <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nede</l>      <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>net</l>       <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nende</l>     <r>ne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="svøm/me__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>me</l>        <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mer</l>       <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mes</l>       <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mede</l>      <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>met</l>       <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mende</l>     <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bræk/ke__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ke</l>        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ker</l>       <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kes</l>       <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kede</l>      <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ket</l>       <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kende</l>     <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="byt/te__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ter</l>       <r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tes</l>       <r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tede</l>      <r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tet</l>       <r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tende</l>     <r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="kys/se__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ser</l>       <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ses</l>       <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sede</l>      <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>set</l>       <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sende</l>     <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="tør/re__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rer</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>res</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rede</l>      <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ret</l>       <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rende</l>     <r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="rul/le__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ler</l>       <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>les</l>       <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lede</l>      <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>let</l>       <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lende</l>     <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="skub/be__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>be<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>be</l>        <r>be<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ber</l>       <r>be<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bes</l>       <r>be<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bede</l>      <r>be<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bet</l>       <r>be<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bende</l>     <r>be<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="tyg/ge__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ge</l>        <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ger</l>       <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ges</l>       <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gede</l>      <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>get</l>       <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gende</l>     <r>ge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="skaf/fe__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>fe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fe</l>        <r>fe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fer</l>       <r>fe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fes</l>       <r>fe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fede</l>      <r>fe<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fet</l>       <r>fe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fende</l>     <r>fe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="dyp/pe__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pe</l>        <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>per</l>       <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pes</l>       <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pede</l>      <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pet</l>       <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pende</l>     <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="afpasse">         <i>afpas</i><par n="kys/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="afstraffe">       <i>afstraf</i><par n="skaf/fe__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="afstresse">       <i>afstres</i><par n="kys/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="aftrappe">        <i>aftrap</i><par n="dyp/pe__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="anskaffe">        <i>anskaf</i><par n="skaf/fe__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="babysitte">       <i>babysit</i><par n="byt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bakke">           <i>bak</i><par n="bræk/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="begrunde">        <i>begrund</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="belønne">         <i>beløn</i><par n="dan/ne__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="beskæmme">        <i>beskæm</i><par n="svøm/me__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="blotte">          <i>blot</i><par n="byt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="brække">          <i>bræk</i><par n="bræk/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bølle">           <i>bøl</i><par n="rul/le__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="danne">           <i>dan</i><par n="dan/ne__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="drysse">          <i>drys</i><par n="kys/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dugge">           <i>dug</i><par n="tyg/ge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dvæle">           <i>dvæl</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dyppe">           <i>dyp</i><par n="dyp/pe__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ebbe">            <i>eb</i><par n="skub/be__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="flamme">          <i>flam</i><par n="svøm/me__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="flække">          <i>flæk</i><par n="bræk/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="forbløffe">       <i>forbløf</i><par n="skaf/fe__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="forfatte">        <i>forfat</i><par n="byt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="forpurre">        <i>forpur</i><par n="tør/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="forskønne">       <i>forskøn</i><par n="dan/ne__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="forstyrre">       <i>forstyr</i><par n="tør/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="forvirre">        <i>forvir</i><par n="tør/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fremstille">      <i>fremstil</i><par n="rul/le__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gafle">           <i>gafl</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hugge">           <i>hug</i><par n="tyg/ge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hæmme">           <i>hæm</i><par n="svøm/me__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="indeslutte">      <i>indeslut</i><par n="byt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="indespærre">      <i>indespær</i><par n="tør/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="interesse">       <i>interes</i><par n="kys/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="jamme">           <i>jam</i><par n="svøm/me__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kidnappe">        <i>kidnap</i><par n="dyp/pe__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="klikke">          <i>klik</i><par n="bræk/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="klynge">          <i>klyng</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="krølle">          <i>krøl</i><par n="rul/le__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mobbe">           <i>mob</i><par n="skub/be__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="nedstamme">       <i>nedstam</i><par n="svøm/me__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="nippe">           <i>nip</i><par n="dyp/pe__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ombygge">         <i>ombyg</i><par n="tyg/ge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="omdanne">         <i>omdan</i><par n="dan/ne__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="opfostre">        <i>opfostr</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="passe">           <i>pas</i><par n="kys/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="plette">          <i>plet</i><par n="byt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sammenflikke">    <i>sammenflik</i><par n="bræk/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skaffe">          <i>skaf</i><par n="skaf/fe__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skinne">          <i>skin</i><par n="dan/ne__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skrælle">         <i>skræl</i><par n="rul/le__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skubbe">          <i>skub</i><par n="skub/be__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skæmme">          <i>skæm</i><par n="svøm/me__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="slentre">         <i>slentr</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sniffe">          <i>snif</i><par n="skaf/fe__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="spærre">          <i>spær</i><par n="tør/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stritte">         <i>strit</i><par n="byt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tigge">           <i>tig</i><par n="tyg/ge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tildække">        <i>tildæk</i><par n="bræk/ke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tippe">           <i>tip</i><par n="dyp/pe__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tosse">           <i>tos</i><par n="kys/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tørre">           <i>tør</i><par n="tør/re__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="uddanne">         <i>uddan</i><par n="dan/ne__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="underspille">     <i>underspil</i><par n="rul/le__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zigzagge">        <i>zigzag</i><par n="tyg/ge__vblex"/></e>
